es: Forma del cabezal del mazo del bombo: Barril; Cara plana; Ovalado; Redondo; Cara cuadrada; Gota; Otro
vi: Hình dạng đầu dùi trống bass: Hình trống; Mặt phẳng; Hình bầu dục; Hình tròn; Mặt vuông; Hình giọt nước; Khác
lt-LT: Bosinio būgno plaktuko galvutės forma: Statinės formos; Plokščias paviršius; Ovalo formos; Apvalus; Kvadratinis paviršius; Lašo formos; Kita
ja: バスドラムビーターヘッドのShapes: バレル; フラットフェイス; オーバル; ラウンド; スクエアフェイス; ティアドロップ; その他
it: Shapesdella pelle battente della grancassa: A barile; A faccia piatta; Ovale; Rotondo; A faccia quadrata; A goccia; Altro
ro-RO: Forma capului bețelor de tobă bas: Butoi; Față plană; Oval; Rotund; Față pătrată; Lacrimă; Altele
nb: Former på basstrommehode: Tønne; Flat overflate; Oval; Rund; Firkantet overflate; Dråpeformet; Annet
fr: Profil de la tête de batteur de la grosse caisse: Tonneau; Face plate; Ovale; Ronde; Face carrée; Goutte d’eau; Autre
hr-HR: Oblik palice za bas-bubanj: Bačvasti; Ravna površina; Ovalni; Okrugli; Kvadratna površina; U obliku suze; Ostalo
da: Form på stortrommens beaterhoved: Tønde; Flad front; Oval; Rund; Firkantet front; Dråbeformet; Andet
sv: Bastrumklubbornas form: Tunna; Platt yta; Oval; Rund; Fyrkantig yta; Droppformad; Övrigt
sl-SI: Oblika glave tolkala za bas boben: Sodček; Ravna površina; Ovalna; Okrogla; Kvadratna površina; Solza; Drugo
pt-BR: Forma da baqueta do bumbo: Barril; Face plana; Oval; Redondo; Face quadrada; Gota; Outros
ko: 베이스 드럼 비터 헤드 형태: 배럴형; 플랫 페이스; 타원형; 원형; 사각 페이스; 물방울형; 기타
el: Σχήμα κεφαλής μπαγκέτας μπάσου τυμπάνου: Βαρελάκι; Επίπεδη όψη; Οβάλ; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνη όψη; Δάκρυ; Άλλο
bg-BG: Форма на ударната глава на палката за бас барабан: Барел; Плоско лице; Овална; Кръгла; Квадратно лице; Сълза; Друго
en: Bass drum beater head shape: Barrel; Flat face; Oval; Round; Square face; Teardrop; Other
sk-SK: Tvar hlavy paličiek na basový bubon: Súdkovitá; Plochá predná strana; Oválna; Okrúhla; Štvorcová predná strana; V tvare slzy; Iná
ru: Форма головки бита бас-барабана: Бочонок; Плоская поверхность; Овальная; Круглая; Квадратная поверхность; Каплевидная; Другое
th: รูปทรงหัวกระเดื่องกลองเบส: ทรงถัง; หน้าแบน; วงรี; กลม; หน้าเหลี่ยม; รูปหยดน้ำ; อื่นๆ
pl: Kształt główki bijaka stopy perkusyjnej: Beczka; Płaskie lico; Owalny; Okrągły; Kwadratowe lico; Łezka; Inny
fi: Bassorummun nuijan pään muoto: Tynnyri; Tasainen pinta; Soikea; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen pinta; Pisara; Muu
nl: Bassdrumklopper kopvorm: Ton; Platte voorkant; Ovaal; Rond; Vierkante voorkant; Druppel; Overig
pt-PT: Forma da cabeça da maceta de bombo: Barril; Face plana; Oval; Redondo; Face quadrada; Gota; Outro
de: Kopfform des Bassdrum-Schlägels: Fassförmig; Flache Schlagfläche; Oval; Rund; Eckige Schlagfläche; Tropfenförmig; Sonstige
tr: Bas davul tokmak başlığı şekli: Fıçı; Düz yüzeyli; Oval; Yuvarlak; Kare yüzeyli; Damla; Diğer
zh-TW: 大鼓槌頭形狀: 桶型; 平面; 橢圓形; 圓形; 方面; 水滴形; 其他
zh-CN: 低音鼓鼓槌头形状: 桶形; 平面; 椭圆形; 圆形; 方形面; 泪滴形; 其他
cs: Tvar hlavy paličky na basový buben: Soudek; Plochá úderová plocha; Ovál; Kulatá; Čtvercová úderová plocha; Kapka; Jiné
hu: Nagydob ütőfejformája: Hordó alakú; Lapos felületű; Ovális; Kerek; Szögletes felületű; Csepp alakú; Egyéb